Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB843.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 107.310 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 107.310[107.320] to 107.500, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) ["District" means a county community improvement district established as provided
in KRS 107.310 to 107.500;
(2) ]"Board" means the board of commissioners which controls and manages the affairs
of the district;
(2)[(3) "Governmental unit" means a county or any city of any class, or any corporate
agency of any such county or city, or any independent district, authority or other
municipal corporation except a board of education, existing within the area of the
district; and
(4)] "Building and related facilities," or "building" or "facilities" means any real or
personal property, including but not limited to structures, sites, parks, forests,
wharves, floodwalls, boats and other improvements except sewers, drainage
facilities and other utilities unless related to one of the foregoing;
(3) "District" means a county community improvement district established as
provided in KRS 107.310 to 107.500;
(4) "Governmental unit" means a county or any city of any class, or any corporate
agency of any such county or city, or any independent district, authority or other
municipal corporation except a board of education, existing within the area of the
district;
(5) "Green bond" means a fixed-income debt instrument earmarked to raise money
for climate or environmental projects:
(6) "Green infrastructure"
(a) Means a strategically planned network of natural and semi-natural areas
with other environmental features designed and managed to deliver a wide
Page 1 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
range of ecosystem services while also enhancing biodiversity; and
(b) May include water purification, water and stormwater management,
improving air quality, providing or enhancing recreational spaces, urban
heat control, and natural features that provide other benefits to persons and
the environment; and
(7) "Social impact bond" means a fixed-income debt instrument with the public
sector or local or state government where, by the terms of the contract, payment
will be made for specified social outcomes in the areas defined in the contract.
Section 2. KRS 107.330 is amended to read as follows:
The purpose of the district shall be to provide for the:
(1) Acquisition or construction, and the necessary equipping of, such buildings and
related facilities as may be needed, for any project which serves a county purpose,
by any governmental unit within the territorial limits of the district, or any
combination of any such units;
(2) Installation and maintenance of public infrastructure that includes streetscapes,
sidewalks, broadband, stormwater conveyance, green infrastructure and energy
conservation measures;
(3) Acquisition, rehabilitation, and development of housing that is affordable to
persons who make between sixty percent (60%) and one hundred twenty percent
(120%) of the area median income and affordable housing as defined by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(4) Acquisition, maintenance, and operation of street lighting and video cameras
used for public safety;
(5) Initiation and operation of public health and safety programs such as programs,
including programs designed to engage community members in an effort to deter
crime and programs designed to promote healthy lifestyles; and
(6) Initiation and operation of economic development tools that may include small
Page 2 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
business promotion, workforce training, and programs and strategies that bring
vacant properties back into productive use.
Section 3. KRS 107.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A district shall be administered by a board of commissioners [(the "board")], which
shall control and manage the affairs of the district. The term of each commissioner
shall be four (4) years except as herein specified. The board shall consist of four (4)
members who shall be appointed by the county judge/executive with the approval
of the fiscal court. Initial appointments shall be for terms of one (1), two (2), three
(3) and four (4) years as designated by the county judge/executive. Thereafter, as
the term of each member expires, his successor shall be appointed for a term of four
(4) years. Not more than three-fourths (3/4) of the persons appointed to membership
on the board shall be members of the same political party, as determined, in the
case of each person, by such person's registration record at the time of his or her
appointment. In addition, the county judge/executive shall ensure that the
composition of the board members includes a diverse balance of property owners,
residents, tenants, small business owners, and other persons who could be
affected by the operations of the district so that no particular interest has an
overwhelming control of the district.
(2) The board shall elect its chairman from among its members and may appoint a
secretary, an executive director, and other officials and employees who need not be
members of the board. Members of the board shall not receive compensation for
their services, but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred
in the performance of their duties. A quorum for the transacting of the business of
the board shall consist of three (3) members.
(3) A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
Section 4. KRS 107.350 is amended to read as follows:
In order to accomplish its purposes the district, through its board, may request the fiscal
Page 3 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
court of the county in which it is located to levy an ad valorem tax on all property within
the district which is assessed for local taxation at a rate which shall not exceed ten[ (10)]
cents ($0.10) per $100 of assessed value of said property and which shall not exceed the
amount necessary to amortize any bonds,[ (] whether revenue bonds, green bonds, social
impact bonds, or general obligation bonds,[)] issued or proposed to be issued to finance
the project or projects proposed by the district, plus operating expenses of the district. All
ad valorem taxes authorized by KRS 107.310 to 107.500 shall be collected in the same
manner as are county ad valorem taxes and shall be turned over to the board as the
governing body of the district. Such ad valorem taxes shall be solely for the benefit and
purposes of the district and shall be in addition to all other ad valorem taxes. Said fiscal
court shall levy the ad valorem tax so requested initially and from year to year thereafter
if required to amortize any bonds, [(]whether revenue bonds, green bonds, social impact
bonds, or general obligation bonds[)] issued or proposed for a project not disapproved
under the authority of KRS 107.310 to 107.500, but it shall refuse to levy any tax if no
bonds, [(]whether revenue bonds, green bonds, social impact bonds, or general
obligation bonds,[)] are issued or outstanding, and if the proposed project to be financed
by the bonds has been disapproved as set out in KRS 107.360.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 107.310 TO 107.500 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to the ad valorem tax allowed under Section 4 of this Act, a community
improvement district may request a city or a county to use special assessments imposed
under KRS 91A.200 to 91A.290 to support the projects of the community improvement
district. Any county so requested shall have the authority to levy a special assessment
using the terms and conditions established for cities under KRS 91A.200 to 91A.290.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 107.310 TO 107.500 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Community improvement districts may receive moneys from private partners as defined
Page 4 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
in KRS 65.025, to achieve the purposes of the district by contract.
Section 7. KRS 107.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall annually file a written report concerning its operations with the
county judge/executive and the Department for Local Government, which shall
make this information available on its official website. In addition to general
information concerning its operations, the board shall include performance
information regarding:
(a) Property values of properties within the district or adjacent to the district
that are affected by the district's operations;
(b) Employment, including job creation data;
(c) Housing, including the number of housing units available in the district
and the residents housed in the district by socioeconomic terms; and
(d) Equity outcomes of the projects conducted by the district relating to the
socioeconomic status of persons within the district.
(2) The board shall comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.
Section 8. KRS 65.7043 is amended to read as follows:
The purposes of KRS 65.7041 to 65.7083 are as follows:
(1) KRS 65.7047 provides authority for cities and counties to establish local
development areas for the development of previously undeveloped land within their
jurisdictional boundaries and to devote local resources to support the development
of projects in those local development areas. Local development areas established
under KRS 65.7047 and projects within local development areas shall not be
eligible for participation by the Commonwealth; and
(2) (a) KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053 provide a framework for cities and
counties:
1. To establish development areas for:
a. The redevelopment of previously developed land within their
Page 5 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
jurisdictional boundaries, including projects initiated under
Section 2 of this Act by a community improvement district; and
b. The development of previously undeveloped land, if:
i. The project proposed for the development area includes an
arena as part of the proposed development;
ii. The project is a mixed-use development located in a
university research park;
iii. The project is a mixed-use development located within three
(3) miles of a military base that houses, deploys, or employs
any combination of at least twenty-five thousand (25,000)
military personnel, their families, military retirees, or civilian
employees;
iv. The project is a mixed-use development which includes
either or both significant public storm water and sanitary
sewer facilities designed to comply with a community-wide
court decree mandating corrective action by the local
government or an agency thereof;[ or]
v. The project is a mixed-use development that includes a tract
of previously undeveloped land that was owned by a liberal
arts educational institution within four (4) years prior to
April 10, 2017, and the previously undeveloped land is
bounded on one (1) side by a four (4) lane United States
highway on April 10, 2017. No more than fifty percent
(50%) of the previously undeveloped land shall be used for
qualified mixed uses; or
vi. The project is initiated under Section 2 of this Act by a
community improvement district; and
Page 6 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
2. To devote local resources to providing redevelopment assistance and
supporting projects in those development areas.
(b) Projects within development areas established pursuant to KRS 65.7049,
65.7051, and 65.7053 shall be eligible for participation by the Commonwealth
if such projects meet the requirements for Commonwealth participation
established by Subchapter 30 of KRS Chapter 154.
Section 9. KRS 65.7045 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 65.7041 to 65.7083:
(1) "Activation date" means the date established any time within a two (2) year period
after the commencement date. The activation date is the date on which the time
period for the pledge of incremental revenues shall commence. The governing body
may extend the two (2) year period to no more than four (4) years upon written
application by the agency requesting the extension. To implement the activation
date, the agency that is a party to the local participation agreement or the local
development area agreement shall notify the governing body that created the
development area or local development area;
(2) "Agency" means:
(a) An urban renewal and community development agency established under
KRS Chapter 99;
(b) A development authority established under KRS Chapter 99;
(c) A nonprofit corporation;
(d) A housing authority established under KRS Chapter 80;
(e) An air board established under KRS 183.132 to 183.160;
(f) A local industrial development authority established under KRS 154.50-301
to 154.50-346;
(g) A riverport authority established under KRS 65.510 to 65.650;
(h) A transportation improvement district established under KRS 184.350 to
Page 7 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
184.395;[ or]
(i) A community improvement district established under KRS 107.310 to
107.500; or
(j) A designated department, division, or office of a city or county;
(3) "Arena" means a facility which serves primarily as a venue for athletic events, live
entertainment, and other performances, and which has a permanent seating capacity
of at least five thousand (5,000);
(4) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority
established by KRS 154.20-010;
(5) "Brownfield site" means real property, the expansion, redevelopment, or reuse of
which may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of a hazardous
substance, pollutant, or contaminant;
(6) "Capital investment" means:
(a) Obligations incurred for labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and
materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction, installation,
equipping, and rehabilitation of a project;
(b) The cost of acquiring land or rights in land within the development area on the
footprint of the project, and any cost incident thereto, including recording
fees;
(c) The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required
or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, installation,
equipping, and rehabilitation of a project which is not paid by the contractor
or contractors or otherwise provided;
(d) All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings,
surveys, estimates, plans, specifications, preliminary investigations,
supervision of construction, and the performance of all the duties required by
or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and
Page 8 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
rehabilitation of a project;
(e) All costs that are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the
acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a
project; and
(f) All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection;
(7) "City" means any city, consolidated local government, or urban-county
government;
(8) "Commencement date" means:
(a) The date on which a local development area agreement is executed; or
(b) The date on which a local participation agreement is executed;
(9) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(10) "County" means any county, consolidated local government, charter county, unified
local government, or urban-county government;
(11) "Debt charges" means the principal, including any mandatory sinking fund deposits,
interest, and any redemption premium, payable on increment bonds as the payments
come due and are payable and any charges related to the payment of the foregoing;
(12) "Development area" means an area established under KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and
65.7053;
(13) "Economic development projects" means projects which are approved for tax
credits under Subchapter 20, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 34, or 48 of KRS Chapter
154;
(14) "Establishment date" means the date on which a development area or a local
development area is created. If the development area, local development area,
development area plan, or local development area plan is modified or amended
subsequent to the original establishment date, the modifications or amendments
shall not extend the existence of the development area or local development area
beyond what would be permitted under KRS 65.7041 to 65.7083 from the original
Page 9 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
establishment date;
(15) "Governing body" means the body possessing legislative authority in a city or
county;
(16) "Increment bonds" means bonds and notes issued for the purpose of paying the
costs of one (1) or more projects, or grant or loan programs as described in
subsection (30)(c) of this section, in a development area or a local development
area;
(17) "Incremental revenues" means the amount of revenues received by a taxing district,
as determined by subtracting old revenues from new revenues in a calendar year
with respect to a development area, a project within a development area, or a local
development area;
(18) "Issuer" means a city, county, or agency issuing increment bonds;
(19) "Local development area" means a development area established under KRS
65.7047;
(20) "Local development area agreement" means an agreement entered into under KRS
65.7047;
(21) "Local participation agreement" means the agreement entered into under KRS
65.7063;
(22) "Local tax revenues" means:
(a) Revenues derived by a city or county from one (1) or more of the following
sources:
1. Real property ad valorem taxes;
2. Occupational license taxes, excluding occupational license taxes that
have already been pledged to support an economic development project
within the development area; and
3. The occupational license fee permitted by KRS 65.7056; and
(b) Revenues derived by any taxing district other than school districts or fire
Page 10 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
districts from real property ad valorem taxes;
(23) "Low-income household" means a household in which gross income is no more
than two hundred percent (200%) of the poverty guidelines updated periodically in
the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human
Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. sec. 9902(2);
(24) "Mixed-use" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.30-060;
(25) "New revenues" means the amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing
district with respect to a development area or a local development area in any
calendar year beginning with the year in which the activation date occurred;
(26) "Old revenues" means the amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing district
with respect to a development area or a local development area during the last
calendar year prior to the commencement date. If the governing body determines
that the amount of local tax revenues received during the last calendar year prior to
the commencement date does not represent a true and accurate depiction of
revenues, the governing body may consider revenues for a period of no longer than
three (3) calendar years prior to the commencement date, so as to determine a fair
representation of local tax revenues;
(27) "Outstanding" means increment bonds that have been issued, delivered, and paid
for by the purchaser, except any of the following:
(a) Increment bonds canceled upon surrender, exchange, or transfer, or upon
payment or redemption;
(b) Increment bonds in replacement of which or in exchange for which other
increment bonds have been issued; or
(c) Increment bonds for the payment, redemption, or purchase for cancellation
prior to maturity, of which sufficient moneys or investments, in accordance
with the ordinance or other proceedings or any applicable law, by mandatory
sinking fund redemption requirements, or otherwise, have been deposited, and
Page 11 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
credited in a sinking fund or with a trustee or paying or escrow agent, whether
at or prior to their maturity or redemption, and, in the case of increment bonds
to be redeemed prior to their stated maturity, notice of redemption has been
given or satisfactory arrangements have been made for giving notice of that
redemption, or waiver of that notice by or on behalf of the affected bond
holders has been filed with the issuer or its agent;
(28) "Planning unit" means a planning commission established pursuant to KRS Chapter
100;
(29) "Project" means any property, asset, or improvement located in a development area
or a local development area and certified by the governing body as:
(a) Being for a public purpose; and
(b) Being for the development of facilities for residential, commercial, industrial,
public, recreational, or other uses, or for open space, including the
development, rehabilitation, renovation, installation, improvement,
enlargement, or extension of real estate and buildings; and
(c) Contributing to economic development or tourism;
(30) "Redevelopment assistance," as utilized within a development area, includes the
following:
(a) Technical assistance programs to provide information and guidance to
existing, new, and potential businesses and residences;
(b) Programs to market and promote the development area and attract new
businesses and residents;
(c) Grant and loan programs to encourage the construction or rehabilitation of
residential, commercial, and industrial buildings; improve the appearance of
building facades and signage; and stimulate business start-ups and
expansions;
(d) Programs to obtain a reduced interest rate, down payment, or other improved
Page 12 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
terms for loans made by private, for-profit, or nonprofit lenders to encourage
the construction or rehabilitation of residential, commercial, and industrial
buildings; improve the appearance of building facades and signage; and
stimulate business start-ups and expansions;
(e) Local capital improvements, including but not limited to the installation,
construction, or reconstruction of streets, lighting, pedestrian amenities, public
utilities, public transportation facilities, public parking, parks, playgrounds,
recreational facilities, and public buildings and facilities;
(f) Improved or increased provision of public services, including but not limited
to police or security patrols, solid waste management, and street cleaning;
(g) Provision of technical, financial, or other assistance in connection with:
1. Applications to the Energy and Environment Cabinet for a brownfields
assessment or a No Further Remediation Letter issued pursuant to KRS
224.1-450; or
2. Site remediation by means of the Voluntary Environmental Remediation
Program to remove environmental contamination in the development
area, or lots or parcels within it, pursuant to KRS 224.1-510 to 224.1-
532;[ and]
(h) Direct development by a city, county, or agency of real property acquired by
the city, county, or agency. Direct development may include one (1) or more
of the following:
1. Assembly and replatting of lots or parcels;
2. Rehabilitation of existing structures and improvements;
3. Demolition of structures and improvements and construction of new
structures and improvements;
4. Programs of temporary or permanent relocation assistance for
businesses and residents;
Page 13 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
5. The sale, lease, donation, or other permanent or temporary transfer of
real property to public agencies, persons, and entities both for profit and
nonprofit; and
6. The acquisition and construction of projects; and
(i) Projects undertaken by a community improvement district under Section 2
of this Act;
(31) "Service payment agreement" means an agreement between a city, county, or issuer
of increment bonds or other obligations and any person, whereby the person agrees
to guarantee the receipt of incremental revenues, or the payment of debt charges, or
any portion thereof, on increment bonds or other obligations issued by the city,
county, or issuer;
(32) "Special fund" means a special fund created under KRS 65.7061 in which all
incremental revenues shall be deposited;
(33) "Taxing district" means any city, county, or special taxing district other than school
districts and fire districts;
(34) "Tax incentive agreement" means an agreement entered into under KRS 154.30-
070;
(35) "Termination date" means:
(a) For a development area, a date established by the ordinance creating the
development area that is no more than twenty (20) years from the
establishment date. If a tax incentive agreement for a project within a
development area or a local participation agreement relating to the
development area has a termination date that is later than the termination date
established in the ordinance, the termination date for the development area
shall be extended to the termination date of the tax incentive agreement, or
local participation agreement. However, the termination date for the
development area shall in no event be more than forty (40) years from the
Page 14 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
establishment date;
(b) For a local development area, a date established by the ordinance creating the
local development area that is no more than twenty (20) years from the
establishment date, provided that if a local development area agreement
relating to the local development area has a termination date that is later than
the termination date established in the ordinance, the termination date for the
local development area shall be extended to the termination date of the local
development area agreement;
(c) For a local participation agreement, a date that is no more than twenty (20)
years from the activation date. However, the termination date for a local
participation agreement shall in no event be more than forty (40) years from
the establishment date of the development area to which the local
participation agreement relates; and
(d) For a local development area agreement, a date that is no more than twenty
(20) years from the activation date. However, the termination date for a local
development area agreement shall in no event be more than forty (40) years
from the establishment date of the local development area to which the
development area agreement relates; and
(36) "University research park" means land owned by a public university that has been
designated by the public university as being primarily for the development of
projects and facilities to support high-tech, pharmaceutical, laboratory, and other
research-based businesses, including projects and facilities to support and
complement the development of high-tech, pharmaceutical, laboratory, and other
research-based businesses.
Section 10. KRS 65.7049 is amended to read as follows:
Any city or county may establish a development area pursuant to this section, KRS
65.7051, and 65.7053 to encourage investment and reinvestment in and development,
Page 15 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
use, and reuse of areas of the city or county under the following conditions:
(1) The area shall be contiguous and shall be no more than three (3) square miles;
(2) The establishment or expansion of the development area shall not cause the
assessed value of taxable real property within all development areas and local
development areas of the city or county establishing the development area to exceed
twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of all taxable real property within its
jurisdiction. For the purpose of determining whether the twenty percent (20%)
threshold has been met, the assessed value of taxable real property within all of the
development areas and local development areas shall be valued as of the
establishment date;
(3) The governing body of the city or county shall determine that the development area
either:
(a) Has two (2) or more of the following conditions:
1. Substantial loss of residential, commercial, or industrial activity or use;
2. Forty percent (40%) or more of the households are low-income
households;
3. More than fifty percent (50%) of residential, commercial, or industrial
structures are deteriorating or deteriorated;
4. Substantial abandonment of residential, commercial, or industrial
structures;
5. Substantial presence of environmentally contaminated land;
6. Inadequate public improvements or substantial deterioration in public
infrastructure; or
7. Any combination of factors that substantially impairs or arrests the
growth and economic development of the city or county; impedes the
provision of adequate housing; impedes the development of commercial
or industrial property; or adversely affects public health, safety, or
Page 16 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
general welfare due to the development area's present condition and
use;[ or]
(b) The project meets the requirements of KRS 65.7043(2)(a)1.b.; or
(c) The project is one initiated under Section 2 of this Act by a community
improvement district; and
(4) The governing body of the city or county shall find that all of the following are true
for projects meeting the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this
section:
(a) That the development area is not reasonably expected to be developed without
public assistance. This finding shall be supported by specific reasons and
supporting facts, including a clear demonstration of the financial need for
public assistance; and
(b) That the public benefits of the development area justify the public costs
proposed. This finding shall be supported by specific data and figures
demonstrating that the projected benefits outweigh the anticipated costs and
shall take into account the positive and negative effects of investment in the
development on existing businesses and residents within the community as a
whole; and
(c) 1. That the area immediately surrounding the development area has not
been subject to growth and development through investment by private
enterprise; or
2. If the area immediately surrounding the development area has been
subject to growth and development through investment by private
enterprise, the identification of special circumstances within the
development area that would prevent its development without public
assistance.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 107.310 TO 107.500 IS CREATED
Page 17 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A Community Improvement District Grant Program is hereby established to
consist of a system of grants to community improvement districts established
under this chapter. Grants shall be administered by the Department for Local
Government.
(2) Grants obtained under this program shall be used for projects undertaken by
community improvement districts as authorized pursuant to Section 2 of this Act.
(3) Applications for grants from the fund established for in Section 12 of this Act
shall be made by the community improvement district with any approvals
necessary to guarantee the viability of the project made by the legislative body or
bodies wherein the project is located. The applications shall contain any
additional information required by the Department for Local Government
deemed necessary by the department to carry out the provisions of this section.
(4) The Department for Local Government shall review and approve grant
applications and shall award funds to projects approved until available moneys in
the fund set out in Section 12 of this Act are depleted each fiscal year. The
Department for Local Government shall award grants in proportion to the
community needs and in a manner that includes as many types of projects set
forth in Section 2 of this Act as possible based on the applications submitted by
the community improvement district and the available moneys in the fund.
(5) By October 1 of each year, the commissioner of the Department for Local
Government shall provide, in writing, to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission a listing of all applications for grants received pursuant to
this section since the last report, a listing of all grants awarded, the amount of the
award, the recipient agency, and the related project.
(6) The Department for Local Government shall require that any funds granted
under this section include an agreement that the recipient shall certify that the
Page 18 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
funds were expended for the purpose intended. The department shall determine
whether the certification requires an independent annual audit or an internal
certification taking into account the size of district and the financial burden an
independent annual audit may impose on the district. In the case of an
independent annual audit, the audit report shall include a certification that the
funds were expended for the purpose intended. A copy of the audit or certification
of compliance shall be forwarded to the Department for Local Government within
eighteen (18) months of the end of the fiscal year.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 107.310 TO 107.500 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the Community Improvement District Grant Program fund. The fund
shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and
federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Department for Local Government.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes set out in Section 11
of this Act and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 107.310 TO 107.500 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any project undertaken by a community improvement district after the effective
date of this Act shall either be complete or shall cease operations ten (10) years
after the date the project commences unless the project is authorized to continue
by a majority of persons owning property within the boundaries of the district.
(2) In order to conduct a vote to determine whether or not a project may continue,
the community improvement district shall consult with the county clerk and the
Page 19 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
property valuation administrator to determine properties and owners within the
boundaries of the district, in accordance with the following:
(a) The board of the community improvement district shall advertise, pursuant
to KRS Chapter 424, that a vote will be conducted to seek reapproval of a
project it has undertaken. The advertisement shall at least contain a general
description of the boundaries of the community improvement district, the
opening and closing vote of the date, where and how property owners can
vote, and a description of the project in question;
(b) The board of the community improvement district shall conduct the vote by
mail, in-person voting, electronic voting, or by any other means the board
may choose;
(c) Any means chosen by the board shall ensure that only one (1) vote per
property shall be counted, and that the property owner voting is in fact the
owner of the property, or is otherwise authorized to vote on behalf of the
property;
(d) The time allowed for receiving votes of property owners shall not exceed
ninety (90) days from the time that voting is opened;
(e) The question put before the property owners shall specifically identify the
project the community improvement district seeks to continue, and shall be
framed in a simple and concise manner so that the property owner may vote
"yes" to continue the project or "no" to cease the operations relating to the
project;
(f) The board shall ensure proper chain of custody and security for the votes;
and
(g) In any manner of collecting the votes, the board shall ensure the
confidentiality of any property owner's vote is maintained and the
knowledge of the vote made by the property owner is limited only to staff
Page 20 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 965
tallying the vote.
(3) The timing of the vote shall be such that it is possible to cease any tax collections
or revenue generating means beyond the calendar year of the end of the tenth
year prior to the question of whether or not to continue the project.
(4) If a majority of property owners vote to continue the project, the project may
continue for another ten (10) years. If less than a majority of the property owners
vote to continue the project, the board of the community improvement district
shall take all necessary steps to ensure the cessation of the project's operations as
soon as practicable after the end of the tenth year.
Page 21 of 21
XXXX 11/24/2025 1:55 PM Jacketed